g2p.xfst
! g2p.xfst -- a grapheme to phoneme conversion tool for Turkish
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!
!
! This FST converts given *analysis string* to a phonetic form in IPA.
! 
!

read lexc analyzer.cpp.lexc
eliminate flags
define Lexicon;


#include "morph-phon.cpp.xfst"

! Vowels
define lcVfront e | i | ö | ü | î ;
define lcVback  a | ı | o | u | â | û ;
define lcVpal   lcVfront | â | û ;
define lcVround ö | ü  | o | u | û;
define lcVowel  lcVfront|lcVback;

define VIPA ạ | ɑ |
            e | ɛ  | æ |
            i | ɪ |
            ɯ |
            œ |
            o | ọ |
            Y | y |
            u | ʊ | ụ ;


! Consonants
define lcCons   b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y |
                p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h ;

define ConsIPA  b
              | dʒ | dʒʰ
              | tʃ | tʃʰ
              | d
              | f  | Φ
              | g  | ɟ
              | γ
              | h  | ç | x
              | ʒ
              | k  | c | kʰ | cʰ
              | l  | ł
              | m
              | n  | ŋ | ɲ
              | p  | pʰ
              | ɾ  | ɾ̥
              | s
              | ∫
              | t  | tʰ
              | v  | ω | β
              | j
              | z ;



define toLower   A -> a, B -> b, C -> c, Ç -> ç, D -> d,
                 E -> e, F -> f, G -> g, Ğ -> ğ, H -> h, I -> ı, İ -> i,
                 J -> j, K -> k, L -> l, M -> m, N -> n, O -> o, Ö -> ö,
                 P -> p, R -> r, S -> s, Ş -> ş, T -> t, U -> u, Ü -> ü,
                 V -> v, Y -> y, Z -> z, Î -> î, Û -> û, Â -> â ;

define noPhon %'|%@RB|%@MB;
define SylB %.;
define Syllabify  lcVowel  -> ... SylB  || _  noPhon* lcVowel
             .o.  [\lcVowel]* lcVowel [\lcVowel]* @> ... SylB
                                      || _  noPhon* lcCons noPhon* lcVowel;

! consonant alternations due to backness/frontness of the vowels

! b -> b  - always
! p -> p  - always


define toipa c -> dʒ,
             ç -> tʃ,
             ş -> ∫,
             j -> ʒ,
             y -> j;

define palatalize k -> c ,  ! more palatalized in some loan words: kağıt
                  g -> ɟ ,  ! more palatalized in some loan words: dergah
                  l -> ł    ! 
                         || _ [\SylB]* lcVpal, lcVpal [\SylB]* _ ;

define aspirate  p  -> pʰ,
                 t  -> tʰ,
                 k  -> kʰ,
                 c  -> cʰ,
                 tʃ -> tʃʰ,
                 dʒ -> dʒʰ
                        ||  _ noPhon* lcVowel , _ noPhon* .#.  ;

define vforms   v -> β || lcVround [\lcVowel]* _ .#. ,
                          .#. _ [\lcVowel]* lcVround
           .o.  v -> ω || lcVround [\lcVowel]* _,
                          _ [\lcVowel]* lcVround;

! TODO: h may disappear, or lenghen the vowels kahve, Ahmet, pastahane
define hforms   h -> ç  || _ lcVfront, lcVfront _ lcCons, lcVfront _ .#.
           .o.  h -> x  || lcVback _ lcCons, lcVback _ .#.;

! TODO: Enver, amfi : nasaliztion before f and v
define nforms   n -> ŋ  || lcVback _ [k|g|kʰ]
        .o.     n -> ɲ  || lcVfront _ [c|ɟ|cʰ] ;

define finalr   r -> ɾ  || _ .#.;

! TODO:  More to be done here!
!    - deeltion of one of the vowels in v _ v context.
!    - alternatively/optionally ğ -> j between front vowels
!    - soωan / soωuk ??
!    - both vowels surface as 'a' betwen a _ ı and ı _ a 
!    - j between i _ e 
define yumusakg  ğ -> %: || _ SylB,
                            _ .#. ,
                            a _ a,
                            â _ â,
                            ı _ ı,
                            o _ o,
                            u _ u,
                            û _ û,
                            e _ e,
                            i _ i,
                            ö _ ö,
                            ü _ ü,
                            î _ î
        .o. ğ -> 0     || lcVowel _ lcVowel
        .o. ğ -> γ; !! TODO: ???

define optionalF1 f -> Φ ||  _ [\SylB]* Vround; ! G&K: some speaker only
define optionalF2 f -> Φ ||  Vround [\Vowel]* _ .#.; ! G&K: even to a lesser extent
!define k -> c || _ Vfront, Vfront _
!      .o.
!       

define toIPAcons  toipa .o. palatalize .o. aspirate .o. vforms .o. hforms .o. nforms .o. finalr .o. yumusakg .o. optionalF1 .o. optionalF2;


!
! Vowels

! TODO: the circumflexed vowels need attention

define circumflex â -> ạ, î -> i , û -> u;

define aforms   a -> ɑ ; ! it should be a (or ạ according to G&K, maybe ä)
                         ! with some of the borrowings, but we do not have them 
                         ! marked in the lexicon yet.

define eforms   e -> ɛ   || _ [noPhon|SylB]* .#.
         .o.    e -> æ   || _ [l|ł|m|n|ŋ|ɲ|r|ɾ] [noPhon|SylB]* [\Vowel|.#.];
         ! e otherwise

define iforms   i -> ɪ   || _ [noPhon|SylB]* .#. ;
         ! i otherwise

define Iforms   ı -> ɯ  ; ! everywhere

! o -> ọ in loan words before /l/ (G&K)

define Oforms   ö -> œ ; ! everywhere



define uforms   u -> ʊ   || _ [noPhon|SylB]* .#. ;
         ! ụ after (before?) loan words with /ɟ/, /c/ and /l/
         ! u otherwise

define Uforms   ü -> Y   || _ [noPhon|SylB]* .#.
       .o.      ü -> y ;

!
! TODO: parallel replacement here may minimize the FST
!
define toIPAvowels circumflex
        .o. aforms
        .o. eforms
        .o. iforms
        .o. Iforms
        .o. Oforms
        .o. uforms
        .o. Uforms;


!
! Stress related rules
!
! - If there is no stress mark (no irregular stress from the lexicon):
!    - Mark the stress     
! 
!
!

! default final stress
!
!define defaultStress SylB -> ... ˈ ||   _ [\SylB]* .#.;
! or if we mark before the vowel:
!

define stressMark "ˈ";

define deleteBoundary noPhon|SylB|"^NS"|"^NNS" -> 0;

define toIPA toLower
         .o. Syllabify
         .o. toIPAcons
         .o. toIPAvowels
         .o. [ "^NS" | "^NNS" ]  -> 0 || ["^NS"|"^NNS"] \["^NS"|"^NNS"]* _ 
;

define defaultStress 
          \[stressMark|"^NS"|"^NNS"]*
         .o. VIPA -> ˈ ...  ||  _ [\SylB]* .#.;

define negStress ?* "^NNS" ?*
         .o. ˈ -> 0 
         .o. VIPA -> ˈ ...  ||  _ [\SylB]* "^NNS";

define moveStress \"ˈ"* "^NS" ?*
         .o. VIPA -> ˈ ...  ||  _ [\SylB]* "^NS";

define irregStress \"^NNS"* "ˈ" \"^NNS"* ;

define stress defaultStress | negStress | moveStress | irregStress ;

define stressBeforeSyl SylB -> ... ˈ || _ \SylB* ˈ .o. ˈ -> 0 || ˈ ?* _;

define deleteApoSym AposSym -> 0;

regex collapseAsymbols.i
        .o. AFilter
        .o. Abbr
        .o. Lexicon 
        .o. replaceApos
        .o. NumberSpace
        .o. NumericInsSilentP
        .o. NumericSeparator
        .o. CompNoun
        .o. DeleteSI
        .o. DeleteLAR
        .o. InsertN
        .o. InsertS
        .o. DelS
        .o. InsertS
        .o. PronounExceptions
        .o. InsertY
        .o. iDeleteY
        .o. NbeforePassive
        .o. PassiveLN
        .o. Causative
        .o. Optative3
        .o. SpaceBeforeMI
        .o. NegAorist
        .o. DeleteBuffer
        .o. DeYeException
        .o. YorException
        .o. VowelHarmony 
        .o. VowelEpenthesis
        .o. FSDevoicing
        .o. VoicingAssimilation
        .o. Redup
        .o. DeleteSilentP
        .o. KiKu
        .o. DeleteCircumflex
        .o. deleteApoSym
        .o. toIPA 
        .o. stress 
        .o. deleteBoundary ;

! regex toLower
!   .o. Syllabify
!   .o. toIPAcons
!   .o. toIPAvowels
!   .o. stressRule
!   .o. deleteBoundary;

save stack g2p.fst
